Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8405
Charges; exemptions.

(1) A provider shall not charge a fee for medical records requested by a patient for use in supporting an application for disability or other benefits or assistance or an appeal relating to the denial of such benefits or assistance under:

(a) Sections 43-501 to 43-536 regarding assistance for certain children;

(b) The Medical Assistance Act relating to the medical assistance program;

(c) Title II of the federal Social Security Act, as amended, 42 U.S.C. 401 et seq.;

(d) Title XVI of the federal Social Security Act, as amended, 42 U.S.C. 1382 et seq.; or

(e) Title XVIII of the federal Social Security Act, as amended, 42 U.S.C. 1395 et seq.

(2) Unless otherwise provided by law, a provider may charge a fee as provided in section 71-8404 for the medical records of a patient requested by a state or federal agency in relation to the patient's application for benefits or assistance or an appeal relating to denial of such benefits or assistance under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) A request for medical records under this section shall include a statement or document from the department or agency that administers the issuance of the assistance or benefits which confirms the application or appeal.

Laws 1999, LB 17, § 5;

Laws 2006, LB 1248, § 81.

Medical Assistance Act, see section 68-901.